Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 22. Insurance Holding Companies.
Sec. 21.22.170.
Civil penalties for violations.

An insurer failing, without just cause, to file a registration statement required under this chapter shall be required, after notice and hearing under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

, to pay a $200 fine for each day the insurer fails to file the registration. The maximum penalty under this subsection is $50,000. The director may reduce the penalty if the insurer demonstrates to the director that the imposition of the penalty would be a financial hardship to the insurer.

A director or officer of an insurance holding company system who knowingly violates, participates in, assents to, or knowingly permits an officer or agent of an insurer to engage in transactions or make investments that have not been properly reported or submitted under AS

21.22.060

,

21.22.085

, or

21.22.100

, or that violate this chapter, shall pay, in the director’s or officer’s individual capacity, a fine of not more than $50,000 for each violation, after notice and hearing under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

. In determining the amount of the fine, the director shall take into account the appropriateness of the fine with respect to the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and other matters as justice may require.

If the director has reason to believe that an insurer subject to this chapter, or a director, officer, employee, or agent of the insurer, has engaged in a transaction or entered into a contract that is subject to AS

21.22.080

—

21.22.105

, and that would not have been approved had the approval been requested, the director may order the insurer to cease and desist immediately any further activity under that transaction or contract. After notice and hearing under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

, the director may also order the insurer to void any contracts and restore the status quo if the action is in the best interest of the policyholders, creditors, or the public.

If the director has reason to believe that a person has committed a violation of AS

21.22.010

or

21.22.020

that prevents the full understanding of the enterprise risk to an insurer by its affiliates or by the insurance holding company system, the violation may serve as an independent basis for disapproving dividends or distributions and for placing the insurer under an order of rehabilitation in accordance with AS

21.78.090

.

History.

(§ 42 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed and reenacted the section, which read, “An insurer that the director determines, following an appropriate hearing as provided in AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.230

, is guilty of a wilful violation of this chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000. A person who is not an insurer and who the director determines, following an appropriate hearing as provided in AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.230

, to be guilty of a wilful violation of this chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $15,000.”

Sec. 21.22.175.
Criminal penalties.

An insurer or a director, officer, employee, or agent of an insurer who knowingly violates this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

A director, officer, or employee of an insurance holding company system who knowingly subscribes to or makes or causes to be made a false statement, false report, or false filing with the intent to deceive the director under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

An insurer may not pay a fine imposed by a court on a director, officer, employee, or agent that is sentenced under (a) or (b) of this section. The fine must be paid by the director, officer, employee, or agent in the director’s, officer’s, employee’s, or agent’s individual capacity.

In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 43 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effective dates. —

Section 54, ch. 34, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.22.180.
Receivership.

If it appears to the director that a person has committed a violation of this chapter that so impairs the financial condition of a domestic insurer as to threaten insolvency or make the further transaction of business by it hazardous to its policyholders, creditors, shareholders, or the public, then the director may proceed as provided in AS 21.78 to take possession of the property of that domestic insurer and to conduct its business.

This section does not apply to a violation involving a security that constitutes an acquisition covered by AS

21.22.065

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 48 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.22.190.
Revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of insurer’s authority.

If the director finds, after giving notice and an opportunity to be heard, that a person has committed a violation of this chapter that makes the continued operation of an insurer contrary to the interests of its policyholders or the public, the director may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the insurer’s license or authority to do business in this state for a period that the director finds is required for the protection of policyholders or the public.
Such a determination by the director must be accompanied by specific findings of fact and conclusions of law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976)

Sec. 21.22.200.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“acquisition” means an agreement, arrangement, or activity the consummation of which results in a person acquiring directly or indirectly the control of another person, and includes the acquisition of voting securities, assets, bulk reinsurance, and mergers;

“affiliate” or “affiliated” means a person who directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the persons specified;

“control”, “controlling”, “controlled by”, and “under common control with” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or non-management services, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an official position with or corporate office held by the person; “control” is presumed to exist if any person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, 10 percent or more of the voting securities of any other person; this presumption may be rebutted by a showing made in the manner provided by AS

21.22.060(j)

that control does not exist in fact; the director may determine, after furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be heard and making specific findings of fact to support that determination, that control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect;

“domestic insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.97.900

and, in addition, for the purposes of this chapter, includes an insurer that has been authorized to do business in this state and that, during its three preceding fiscal years taken together, or during any lesser period of time if it has been licensed to transact its business in this state only for a lesser period of time, has written an average of more gross premiums in this state than it has written in its state of domicile during the same period, and the gross premiums written constitute 33 percent or more of its total gross premiums written everywhere in the United States for the three-year or lesser period, as reported in its three most recent annual statements;

“enterprise risk” means an activity, circumstance, event, or series of events involving one or more affiliates of an insurer that, if not remedied promptly, is likely to have a material adverse effect on the financial condition or liquidity of the insurer or its insurance holding company system as a whole including anything that would cause the insurer’s risk based capital to fall into company action level under AS

21.14.020

or would cause the insurer to be impaired or in imminent danger of becoming impaired, as defined in AS

21.97.900

and regulations adopted by the director;

“group-wide supervisor” means the regulatory official authorized to engage in conducting and coordinating group-wide supervision activities who is determined or acknowledged by the director under AS

21.22.117

to have sufficient significant contacts with the internationally active insurance group;

“highly concentrated” means a market in which the share of the four largest insurers is 75 percent or more of the market;

“insurance holding company system” means a system consisting of two or more affiliated persons, one or more of which is an insurer;

“insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.97.900

and includes a company or group of companies under common management, ownership, or control; it does not include agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, a state or political subdivision of a state;

“internationally active insurance group” means an insurance holding company system that includes an insurer registered under AS

21.22.060

and that meets the following criteria:

insurers that are part of the insurance holding company system write premiums in at least three countries;

the percentage of gross premiums written outside the United States is at least 10 percent of the insurance holding company system’s total gross written premiums; and

based on a three-year rolling average, the total assets of the insurance holding company system are at least $50,000,000,000 or the total gross written premiums of the insurance holding company system are at least $10,000,000,000.

“involved insurer” means an insurer that either acquires or is acquired, is affiliated with an acquirer or acquired, or is the result of a merger;

“market” or “insurance market” means direct written insurance premium in this state for a line of business as contained in the annual statement required to be filed by insurers licensed to do business in this state; in determining the relevant product and geographical markets, the director shall give due consideration to, among other things, the definitions or guidelines adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and to information submitted by parties to the acquisition; in the absence of sufficient information to the contrary, the relevant product market is assumed to be the direct written insurance premium for a line of business, the line being that used in the annual statement required to be filed by insurers doing business in this state, and the relevant geographical market is assumed to be this state;

“person” means an individual, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, any similar entity or any combination of these entities acting in concert, but does not include a joint venture partnership exclusively engaged in owning, managing, leasing, or developing real or tangible personal property, or a securities broker performing not more than the usual and customary broker’s function;

“security holder” means one who owns any security of a specified person, including common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and any other security convertible into or evidencing the right to acquire any of them;

“statement value” means the value that an insurer is instructed by the securities valuation office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners to carry on the insurer’s financial statement and that represents an investment;

“subsidiary” means an affiliate controlled by a specified person directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries;

“supervisory college” means a forum for cooperation and communication among the involved state, federal, and international regulators established for the fundamental purpose of facilitating the effectiveness of supervision of entities that belong to an insurance holding company system.

“voting security” includes any security convertible into or evidencing a right to acquire the right to vote for management and the right to vote on other matters as provided in a corporation’s articles of incorporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 49 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 44, 45 ch 34 SLA 2015; am § 6 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Section 49,
ch. 67, SLA 1992 added a definition of “insurer” even though the term was already defined in former paragraph (6) (current (7)).
To give effect to all enacted language, the language added by § 49,
ch. 67, SLA 1992 was added to the language in effect on the effective date of
ch. 67, SLA 1992, with a minor word change to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. In 2010, in paragraphs (4) and (7), “
AS

21.97.900

” was substituted for “
AS

21.90.900

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of
AS

21.90.900

.

Paragraphs renumbered in 1992, 2015, and 2019 to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

For investments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (10), inserted “a limited liability company,” following “an individual, a corporation,” near the beginning, and “a joint venture partnership exclusively engaged in owning, managing, leasing, or developing real or tangible personal property, or” following “but does not include”, and made a stylistic change; added (15) [now (5)] and (16) [now (15)].

The 2019 amendment, effective July 20, 2019, added (17) and (18) [now (6) and (10), respectively].